Utah statutes.
26-21-24.   Prohibition against bed banking by nursing care facilities for
Medicaid reimbursement.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "bed banking" means the designation of a nursing care facility bed as not
part of the facility's operational bed capacity; and
(b)  "nursing care facility" is as defined in Subsection 26-21-23(1).
(2)  Beginning July 1, 2008, the department shall, for purposes of Medicaid
reimbursement under Chapter 18, Part 1, Medical Assistance Programs, prohibit
the banking of nursing care facility beds.
